California statutes. Education Code
(2) Subtract from the number of pupils calculated in paragraph (1) the number of pupils that were housed in facilities to which the school district or county office of education relinquished title as the result of a transfer of a special education program between a school district
 and a county office of education or special education local plan area, if applicable. For this purpose, the total number of pupils that were housed in the facilities to which title was relinquished shall be determined using the pupil loading formula adopted by the board pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 17071.25. For purposes of this paragraph, title also includes any lease interest with a duration of greater than five years.

(c) Subtract the number of pupils pursuant to subdivision (b) from the number of pupils determined pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(d) The calculations required to establish eligibility under this article shall result in a distinction between the number of existing unhoused pupils and the number of
 projected unhoused pupils.

(e) Apply the increase or decrease resulting from the difference between the most recent report made pursuant to former Section 42268, as that section read on June 30, 2013, and the report used in determining the baseline capacity of the school district pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 17071.25.

(f) For purposes of calculating projected enrollment pursuant to subdivision (a), the board may adopt regulations to ensure that the enrollment calculation of individuals with exceptional needs receiving special education services is adjusted in the enrollment reporting period in which the transfer occurs and three previous school years as a result of a transfer of a special education program between a school district and a county office of education or a special
 education local plan area. However, the projected enrollment calculation of a county office of education shall only be adjusted if a transfer of title for the special education program facilities has occurred. The regulations, if adopted, shall ensure that if a transfer of title to special education program facilities constructed with state funds occurs within 10 years after initial occupancy of the facility, the receiving school district or school districts shall remit to the state a proportionate share of any financial hardship assistance provided for the project pursuant to Section 17075.10, if applicable.

(g) For a school district with an enrollment of 2,500 or fewer, an adjustment in enrollment projections shall not result in a loss of ongoing eligibility to that school district for a period of five years from the date of the approval of
 eligibility by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 9.   (AB 247)   Effective July 3, 2024.   Operative November 6, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 30 of Ch. 81.)
-------------------------------------------

17071.76.

(a) Whenever the existing school building capacity in any high school attendance area prevents another high school attendance area from receiving the maximum per-unhoused-pupil grant specified for the school district as a whole, the eligibility may be computed separately for each high school attendance area.

(b) For the purposes of eligibility, a school district may combine two or more adjacent high school attendance areas pursuant to the following conditions:

(1) The funding eligibility is for the construction of a high school, junior high school, or elementary school located or to be located in any of those high school attendance areas.

(2) The high school, junior high school, or elementary school to be constructed is to serve pupils residing in each of those high school attendance areas.

(3) The combined eligibility reflects the eligibility to which each of the high school attendance areas would otherwise be entitled, reflecting the proportion of projected pupil enrollment in the school to be constructed, as calculated under this chapter, from each of those attendance areas.

(c) The board may permit an elementary school district that is located within a high school district to utilize this section to determine eligibility for funding if all of the following conditions apply:

(1) The elementary school district average daily attendance is greater than 20,000 pupils.

(2) The elementary school district maintains at least 37 elementary schools, and the high school district maintains at least 12 high schools.

(3) The elementary school district has geographical boundaries encompassing more than 100 square miles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 723, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. New Construction Grant Eligibility Determination [17072.10. - 17072.18.]

17072.10.

(a) The board shall determine the maximum total new construction grant eligibility of an applicant by multiplying the number of unhoused pupils calculated pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 17071.75) in each school district with an approved application for new construction, by the per-unhoused-pupil grant as follows:

(1) Five thousand two hundred dollars ($5,200) for elementary school pupils.

(2) Five thousand five hundred dollars ($5,500) for middle school pupils.

(3) Seven thousand two hundred dollars ($7,200) for high school pupils.

(b) The board annually shall adjust the per-unhoused-pupil apportionment to reflect construction cost changes, as set forth in the statewide cost index for class B construction as determined by the board.

(c) Regulations adopted by the board prior to July 1, 2000, that adjust the amounts identified in this section for qualifying individuals with exceptional needs, as defined in Section 56026, as amended after July 1, 2000, in consideration of the recommendations provided pursuant to Section 17072.15, shall continue in effect. An increase made to the per-unhoused-pupil grant amounts set forth in subdivision (a), on or after January 1, 2010, including, but not limited to, those made pursuant to Section 17072.11 on or after January 1, 2010, also shall be made to the
 per-unhoused-pupil who is a qualifying individual with exceptional needs grant amounts established pursuant to this subdivision. If an increase to the per-unhoused-pupil grant amounts differentiates among the pupil groups based on whether the pupils are elementary, middle,
 or high school pupils, the Office of Public School Construction shall recommend to the board, within 60 days of that increase, a methodology to adjust the per-unhoused-pupil grant amount for pupils who are qualifying individuals with exceptional needs so that those adjustments appropriately reflect the increases.

(d) The board may establish a single supplemental per-unhoused-pupil grant in addition to the amounts specified in subdivision (a) based on the statewide average marginal difference in costs in instances where a project requires multilevel school facilities due to limited acreage. The application of a school district shall demonstrate that a practical alternative site is not available.

(e) For a school district having an enrollment of 2,500 or less for the prior fiscal year, the board may approve a supplemental apportionment of up to seven
 thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) for any new construction project assistance. The amount of the supplemental apportionment authorized pursuant to this subdivision shall be adjusted in 2008 and every year thereafter by an amount equal to the percentage adjustment for class B construction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 349, Sec. 1.   (SB 334)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Section operative January 1, 2008, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17072.11.

(a) All of the following shall apply on and after July 1, 2006:

(1) The per-unhoused-pupil grant eligibility determined under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 17072.10 shall be increased by 7 percent.

(2) The per-unhoused-pupil grant eligibility determined under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 17072.10 shall be increased by 4 percent.

(3) The board shall conduct an analysis of the relationship between the per-unhoused-pupil grant eligibility determined under this article and the per-pupil cost of new school construction for elementary, middle, and high school pupils.

(b) On or after January 1, 2008, the board shall increase or decrease the per-unhoused-pupil grant eligibility determined pursuant to subdivision (a) by amounts it deems necessary to cause the grants to correspond to costs of new school construction, provided that the increase in any fiscal year pursuant to this section shall not exceed 6 percent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 730, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

17072.12.

(a) In addition to the amount provided in Section 17072.10, the board may provide funding for assistance in site development and acquisition if all of the following are met:

(1) The amount of the site acquisition and development assistance does not exceed 50 percent of the cost of site development to the school district, plus the lesser of the following:

(A) 50 percent of the site cost to the school district.

(B) 50 percent of the appraised value of the site within six months of the time the complete application is submitted.

(2) The school district certifies that there is no alternative available site, or that the district plans to sell an available site in order to use the proceeds of the sale for the purchase of the new site.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the board may provide funding for assistance in site development and acquisition to a school district that uses land previously acquired by the school district in an amount equal to 50 percent of the cost of site development to the school district, plus 50 percent of the site’s appraised value at the time the application for site acquisition and development is submitted, provided all of the following are met:

(1) The site was acquired no less than five years prior to the date the application is submitted.

(2) The site had been productively used by the school district as other than a schoolsite for the five years immediately preceding the date the application is submitted.

(3) The board determines that the nonschool function currently taking place on the site must be discontinued or relocated in order to utilize the site as a schoolsite.

(c) A school district that receives assistance pursuant to subdivision (b) shall, within one year after the completion of the project, certify in writing to the board that the nonschool function was in fact relocated as set forth in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b).

(d) Pursuant to subdivision (b), an applicant school district shall include in its application to the board a cost-benefit analysis performed by the school district demonstrating how utilizing existing nonschoolsite district property pursuant to this section would be a more effective method of solving the school district’s pupil housing problems than any other method of funding under this chapter. The board shall review and approve the analysis if the board agrees with the findings and shall consider the analysis and findings in approving the project pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 647, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17072.13.

In addition to the amounts provided pursuant to Sections 17072.10 and 17072.12, the board may provide site acquisition and hazardous materials evaluation and response action funding for proposed new schoolsites as follows:

(a) (1) For 50 percent of the cost of the evaluation of hazardous materials at a site to be acquired by a school district and for 50 percent of the other response action costs of the removal of hazardous waste or solid waste, the removal of hazardous substances, or other response action in connection with hazardous substances at that site. Except as provided in subdivision (b), the funding provided pursuant to this section may not exceed 50 percent of the total evaluation and response action costs, including, but not limited to, the costs of the removal of hazardous waste or solid waste, the removal of hazardous substances, or other response action, as determined by the Department of Toxic Substances Control, in connection with hazardous substances at that site, pursuant to standards adopted by the board.

(2) For projects eligible for funding under this subdivision, the total state share of the site acquisition costs, including evaluation and response action, shall not exceed 50 percent of 112 times the appraised value of the uncontaminated site. However, the board may exceed this maximum for projects that demonstrate circumstances of extreme need.

(b) (1) The board may provide funding for up to 100 percent of the cost of the evaluation of hazardous materials at a site to be acquired by a school district eligible for financial hardship assistance pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 17075.10) and for up to 100 percent of the other response action costs for the site. The funding provided pursuant to this subdivision may not exceed 100 percent of the total evaluation and response action costs, including, but not limited to, the costs of the removal of hazardous waste or solid waste, the removal of hazardous substances, or other response action, as determined by the Department of Toxic Substances Control, in connection with hazardous substances at that site, pursuant to standards adopted by the board.

(2) The board may provide funding pursuant to this subdivision only if the State Department of Education certifies that the site is the best available site considering all of the following factors in relation to other available sites:

(A) The total costs of the project, including, but not limited to, costs of evaluation and response action.

(B) The desirability of the site, considering its proximity to pupils and suitability for meeting the educational and safety needs of the school district.

(C) The time required to fully complete the project in relation to the current and projected need for school facilities.

(3) For projects eligible for funding under this subdivision, the total state share of the site acquisition costs, including evaluation and response action, shall not exceed 100 percent of 112 times the appraised value of the uncontaminated site. However, the board may exceed this maximum for projects that demonstrate circumstances of extreme need.

(c) A school district with a proposed site that meets the environmental hardship criteria set forth in paragraph (1) may apply to the board for site acquisition, including, but not limited to, evaluation and response action, funding for that site prior to having construction plans for that site approved by the Division of the State Architect and State Department of Education. 

(1) A project is eligible for environmental hardship site acquisition funding if both of the following apply:

(A) The preparation and implementation of a response action for the site, to be approved by the Department of Toxic Substances Control pursuant to Section 17213, is estimated by the Department of Toxic Substances Control to take six months or more to complete.

(B) The State Department of Education determines that the site is the best available alternative site.

(2) The initial site-specific reservation pursuant to this subdivision shall be for a period of one year. Extension may be approved in one-year intervals upon demonstration to the State Allocation Board of progress toward acquisition, including, but not limited to, evaluation or response, as the case may be. In the event there is not demonstrable progress, the State Allocation Board shall have the option of rescinding the reservation.

(3) Environmental hardship site acquisition funds approved by the State Allocation Board can be used only for the site identified in the response action approved by the Department of Toxic Substances Control.

(4) The date that the State Allocation Board approves the environmental hardship site acquisition funding will become the State Allocation Board approval date for the project’s construction funding for that site.

(5) A school district may apply to the State Allocation Board for construction funding for the environmental hardship site when the project has received final Division of the State Architect plan approval and final State Department of Education site and plan approval.

(d) The cost incurred by the school districts when complying with any requirement identified in this section are allowable costs for purposes of an applicant under this chapter and may be reimbursed in accordance with this section.

(e) The State Allocation Board shall develop regulations that allow school districts with financial hardship site acquisition, including, but not limited to, evaluation and response action, funding prior to ownership of the site or evidence that the site is in escrow.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 935, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

17072.14.

Notwithstanding Section 17070.63, the board may allow adjustments to a new construction grant if, as a result of additional requirements imposed by the Department of Toxic Substances Control, the actual amount paid by a school district for allowable costs of hazardous materials evaluation and removal, including associated fees, exceeds the amount of the grant apportionment for those purposes. The combined amount of the initial apportionment for these purposes and the adjustment pursuant to this section may not exceed the amount permitted pursuant to Section 17072.13.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 570, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

17072.15.

In conjunction with the State Department of Education and the Department of Finance, the Legislative Analyst shall review the method of funding the construction and modernization of school facilities for special education pupils and the amount provided per unhoused special education pupil pursuant to Sections 17072.10 and 17074.10. Pursuant to this review, the Legislative Analyst shall recommend modifications to this method that he or she deems to be advisable on or before September 1, 1999.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 4.   Effective August 27, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17072.17.

In conjunction with the State Department of Education, the Department of Finance, and the Legislative Analyst, the Department of General Services shall review the method of funding the construction and modernization of school facilities for continuation high school, community day school, county community school, and county community day school, teaching stations pursuant to Sections 17072.10 and 17074.10. Pursuant to this review, the Director of General Services shall, by September 1, 2000, recommend modifications to this method that he or she deems to be advisable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 858, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

17072.18.

(a) (1) The board may provide evaluation and response action funding for response costs of the removal of hazardous waste or solid waste, the removal of hazardous substances, or other response action in connection with hazardous substances at an existing schoolsite, in the same manner as provided in Section 17072.13.

(2) Funding as set forth in paragraph (1) may be provided to a school district that has not applied for, or received, funds from the board for the acquisition of a new schoolsite, but which has incurred, or will incur, response costs necessary for the development of the existing schoolsite, if the school district is otherwise eligible for funding under this chapter.

(b) A school district may apply for funding pursuant to this section prior to having construction plans for that site approved by the Division of the State Architect or by the State Department of Education if the school district is otherwise eligible for funding under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 935, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. New Construction Funding Process [17072.20. - 17072.35.]

17072.20.

(a) An applicant school district that has been determined by the board to meet the eligibility requirements for new construction funding set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 17071.10) or Article 3 (commencing with Section 17071.75) may submit at any time a request to the board for a project apportionment for all or a portion of the funding for which the school district is eligible.

(b) The application shall include, but shall not be limited to, the school district’s determination of the amount of state funding that the district is otherwise eligible for relating to site acquisition, site development, new construction, and hardship funding provided pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 17075.10), if any. The amount shall be reduced by the amount of the alternative fee collected pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 65995.7 of the Government Code if a reimbursement election or agreement pursuant to Section 65995.7 of the Government Code is not in effect.

(c) The board shall verify and adjust, as necessary, and approve the district’s application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 935, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

17072.25.

(a) The board shall adopt regulations to develop a mechanism to rank approved applications for new construction funding. This mechanism shall be used to determine the priority of approved applications when either of the following conditions are met:

(1) The total state funds necessary for funding all approved projects pursuant to this chapter exceed the total state funds in the fund for allocation pursuant to this chapter.

(2) The actual amount of unallocated proceeds of state bonds available on or after July 1, 2000, for new construction for the purposes of this chapter is at three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000).

(b) The ranking mechanism shall allocate priority points based upon the percentages of currently and projected unhoused pupils relative to the total population of the applicant district or attendance area and the total number of currently and projected unhoused pupils in an applicant district or attendance area.

(c) The board may award priority points based on other factors that in its judgment result in the most equitable distribution of resources among applicants. The additional factors may not constitute greater than a 10-percent weight in the overall priority ranking.

(d) This section shall apply only to projects funded with the proceeds of state bonds approved by the voters prior to January 1, 2002.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 12.   Effective April 29, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17072.30.

(a) Subject to the availability of funds, the board shall apportion funds to an eligible school district only upon the approval of the project by the Department of General Services pursuant to the Field Act, as defined in Section 17281, and certification by the school district that the required matching funds from local sources have been expended by the district for the project, or have been deposited in the county fund, or will be expended by the district by the time the project is completed, in an amount at least equal to the proposed apportionment pursuant to this chapter, before release of the state funds.

(b) The board shall adjust a school district’s required local contribution pursuant to this section and the school district’s associated state contribution required pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 17072.10), as follows:

(1) For a school district determined to have a score of more than 10 points pursuant to Section 17070.59, the school district’s required local matching funds pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be 45 percent and the associated state contribution pursuant to Article 4
 (commencing with Section 17072.10) shall be 55 percent.

(2) For a school district determined to have a score of 9 or 10 points pursuant to Section 17070.59, the school district’s required local matching funds pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be 47 percent and the associated state contribution pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 17072.10) shall be 53 percent.

(3) For a school district determined to have a score of eight points pursuant to Section 17070.59, the school district’s required local matching funds pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be 48 percent and the associated state contribution pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 17072.10) shall be 52 percent.

(4) For a school district determined to have a score of six or seven points pursuant to Section
 17070.59, the school district’s required local matching funds pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be 49 percent and the associated state contribution pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 17072.10) shall be
 51 percent.

(5) For a school district determined to have a score of less than six points pursuant to Section 17070.59, the required local matching funds pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be 50 percent and the associated state contribution pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 17072.10) shall be 50 percent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 10.   (AB 247)   Effective July 3, 2024.   Operative November 6, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 30 of Ch. 81.)
-------------------------------------------

17072.32.

(a) For any project that has received an apportionment pursuant to Section 17072.30, funding shall be released in amounts equal to the amount of the local match upon certification by the school district that the school district has entered into a binding contract for completion of the approved project.

(b) This section is operative January 1, 2008.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 8) and added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 894, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section operative January 1, 2008, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17072.33.

In the case of site acquisition, a district may request that the state’s share of site assistance be provided to the district in amounts equal to the amount of the local match when the district enters escrow for a site included within a project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 4.   Effective August 27, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17072.35.

(a) A grant for new construction may be used for any and all costs necessary to adequately house new pupils in any approved project, and those costs may only include the cost of design, engineering, testing, inspection, plan checking, construction management, site acquisition and development, evaluation and response action costs relating to hazardous substances at a new or existing schoolsite, demolition, construction, acquisition and installation of portable classrooms, landscaping, necessary utility costs, utility connections and other fees, equipment including telecommunication equipment to increase school security, furnishings, and the upgrading of electrical systems or the wiring or cabling of
 classrooms in order to accommodate educational technology, including schoolsite-based infrastructure necessary to provide access to broadband internet within the schoolsite. A grant for new construction may also be used to acquire an existing government or privately owned building, or a privately financed school building, and for the necessary costs of converting the government or privately owned building for public school use. A grant for new construction may also be used for the costs of designs and materials that promote the efficient use of energy and water, the maximum use of natural lighting and indoor air quality, the use of recycled materials and materials that emit a minimum of toxic substances, the use of acoustics conducive to teaching and learning, and other characteristics of high performance schools. A grant for new
 construction may be used for the costs of design, materials, and construction to advance state energy goals pursuant to state law, support outdoor learning environments, or to directly shade and protect pupils from higher average temperatures, which may include incorporating nature and natural materials. A grant for new construction may be used for seismic mitigation purposes and for related design, study, and testing costs.

(b) This section does not preclude a school district from using a grant for new construction to support the construction of a school kitchen, a transitional kindergarten classroom, a facility to support a local educational agency-administered preschool program, including, but not limited to, a California state preschool program set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 8207) of Chapter 2 of Part 6, that is operated by a
 school district and located on a schoolsite operated by the district, or a facility to support school nurses and counselors to increase access to health care and mental health services.

(c) In developing guidelines and regulations for consideration by the board, the State Department of Education shall provide a school district with maximum flexibility in the design and new construction of school facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 11.   (AB 247)   Effective July 3, 2024.   Operative November 6, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 30 of Ch. 81.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Modernization Eligibility Determination [17073.10. - 17073.25.]

17073.10.

Each school district that desires to receive an apportionment for modernization under this chapter shall submit an application in a form, and in the number of copies, that the board may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 4.   Effective August 27, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17073.15.

(a) A school district is eligible to receive an apportionment for the modernization of a permanent school building that is more than 25 years old or a portable classroom that is at least 20 years old. A school district is eligible to receive an additional apportionment for the modernization of a permanent school building every 25 years after the date of the previous apportionment or a portable classroom every 20 years after the previous apportionment.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a school district that has a school facility located on a military installation that is the recipient of a federal grant for facilities
 modernization that requires a local matching share is eligible to receive an apportionment for the modernization of a permanent or portable building that is at least 10 years old, or is at least 10 years old after the date of the previous modernization apportionment under this chapter.

(2) Portable buildings modernized pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be replaced with a permanent structure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 12.   (AB 247)   Effective July 3, 2024.   Operative November 6, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 30 of Ch. 81.)
-------------------------------------------

17073.16.

(a) A school district eligible for funding pursuant to this article may receive a supplemental grant for either of the following:

(1) Expanding an existing gymnasium, multipurpose room, library, or school kitchen, if the facility is 60 percent or less than the department’s recommended size needed to serve the enrollment of the school.

(2) Constructing a new gymnasium, multipurpose room, library, or school kitchen if the site is lacking one or more of the specified facilities.

(b) A site may receive a supplemental grant for only one project described
 in subdivision (a).

(c) (1) A school district eligible for a modernization apportionment may also receive a supplemental grant for either of the following:

(A) Retrofitting an existing school facility to adequately house transitional kindergarten pupils.

(B) Constructing new transitional kindergarten classrooms if the site is lacking sufficient school facilities to house transitional kindergarten pupils.

(2) A school district that receives a supplemental grant to house transitional kindergarten pupils pursuant to paragraph (1) shall meet the requirements of subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of, paragraphs (2) and (3) of
 subdivision (f) of, and subdivision (g) of, Section 17375.

(d) The funding provided under this section shall be in addition to any other funding provided pursuant to this article.

(e) The board, in consultation with the Superintendent, shall develop regulations
 implementing this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 13.   (AB 247)   Effective July 3, 2024.   Operative November 6, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 30 of Ch. 81.)
-------------------------------------------

17073.20.

Funding may be approved for the modernization of any permanent school building that is more than 25 years old, or any portable classroom that is more than 20 years old, as described in Section 17071.30.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 587, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

17073.25.

(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the State Department of Education is eligible for modernization grants pursuant to this article for facilities of the California School for the Deaf (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 59000) of Part 32) and the California School for the Blind (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 59100) of Part 32).

(b) The department is eligible for per-pupil funding under this article to the same extent and in the same manner as a school district, except that the hardship provisions do not apply. However, notwithstanding the 60 percent maximum funding for modernization projects, as set forth in Section 17074.16, the project shall be funded at 100 percent of the project costs, subject to per-pupil eligibility.

(c) The board shall establish a process specifically tailored to consideration of the unique aspects of applications presented by the department pursuant to this section.

(d) This section applies only to projects for expenditure of the proceeds of state bonds approved by the voters after January 1, 2002.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Modernization Apportionment [17074.10. - 17074.30.]

17074.10.

(a) The board shall determine the total funding eligibility of a school district for modernization funding by multiplying the following amounts by each pupil of that grade level housed in school buildings that satisfy the requirements of Section 17073.15:

(1) Two thousand two hundred forty-six dollars ($2,246) for each elementary pupil.

(2) Two thousand three hundred seventy-six dollars ($2,376) for each middle school pupil.

(3) Three thousand one hundred ten dollars ($3,110) for each high school pupil.

(b) The board shall annually adjust the factors set forth in subdivision (a) according to the adjustment for inflation set forth in the statewide cost index for class B construction, as determined by the board.

(c) The board may adopt regulations to be effective until July 1, 2000, that adjust the amounts identified in this section for qualifying individuals with exceptional needs, as defined in Section 56026. The regulations shall be amended after July 1, 2000, in consideration of the recommendations provided pursuant to Section 17072.15.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that the amounts provided pursuant to this article for school modernization do not include funding for administrative and overhead costs.

(e) For a school district having an enrollment of 2,500 or less for the prior fiscal year, the board may approve a supplemental apportionment of up to two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for any modernization project assistance. The amount of the supplemental apportionment shall be adjusted in 2001 and every year thereafter by an amount equal to the percentage adjustment for class B construction.

(f) For a portable classroom that is eligible for a second modernization, the board shall require the school district to use the modernization funds to replace the portable classroom and to certify that the existing eligible portable classroom will be removed from any classroom use, unless the school district is able to document that modernizing the portable classroom is a better use of public resources. The capacity and eligibility of the school district shall not be adjusted for replacing a portable classroom pursuant to this subdivision and Section 17073.15.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 587, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

17074.15.

(a) The board shall release disbursements to school districts with approved applications for modernization, to the extent state funds are available for the state’s 80-percent share, and the school district has provided its 20-percent local match. Subject to the availability of funds, the board shall apportion funds to an eligible school district only upon the approval of the project by the Department of General Services pursuant to the Field Act, as defined in Section 17281, including, but not limited to, a project that complies with the Field Act by complying with Section 17280.5, and evidence that the certification by the school district that the required 20-percent matching funds from local sources have been expended by the district for the project, or have been deposited in the county fund or will be expended by the district by the time of completion of the project, and evidence that the district has entered into a binding contract for the completion of that project. If state funds are insufficient to fund all qualifying school districts, the board shall fund all qualifying school districts in the order in which the application for funding was approved by the board.

(b) This section shall apply only to an application filed on or before April 29, 2002, regardless of the source of state bond funding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 935, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

17074.16.

(a) The board shall release disbursements to school districts with approved applications for modernization, to the extent state funds are available for the state’s share, and the school district has provided its required local match. Subject to the availability of funds, the board shall apportion funds to an eligible school district only upon the approval of the project by the Department of General Services pursuant to the Field Act, as defined
 in Section 17281, including, but not limited to, a project that complies with the Field Act by complying with Section 17280.5, and evidence that the certification by the school district that the required matching funds from local sources have been expended by the district for the project, or have been deposited in the county fund or will be expended by the district by the time of completion of the project, and evidence that the district has entered into a binding contract for the completion of that project. If state funds are insufficient to fund all qualifying school districts, the board shall fund all qualifying school districts in the order in which the application for funding was approved by the board.

(b) The board shall adjust a school district’s